North Dakota statutes. TITLE 18 Fires
CHAPTER 18-02 Forest Fire Wardens

18-02-01.
Forest fire wardens in organized township. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 203, § 2.

18-02-02.
Forest fire wardens in unorganized township. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 203, § 2.

18-02-03.
Powers and duties of forest fire wardens. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 203, § 2.

18-02-04.
Compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 203, § 2.

18-02-05.
Authority of state forester. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 203, § 2.

18-02-06.
Forest fires defined. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 203, § 2.

18-02-07.
Cooperation of state forester and other agencies — Fire and forest protection.

The state forester may cooperate and contract jointly or severally with departments and agencies of this or other states, with federal agencies, with counties, townships, or other political subdivisions, including rural fire protection districts, rural fire departments, municipal, and other corporations and associations, or with individuals, in the best interests of the people and the state in forest surveys, research in forestry, forest protection, including assisting fire departments in protection of forests and other resources and in assisting landowners to secure adoption of better forestry practices. The state forester may:

Cooperate and contract with the United States or any appropriate agency thereof to receive and use federal aid and matching funds which the state and its subdivisions may become eligible to receive.

Apply for, receive, and expend federal grants-in-aid and matching funds for fire protection services and generally aid rural fire departments and rural fire protection districts with all activities customary in the prevention and suppression of forest, brush, and grassland fires.

Purchase or otherwise acquire fire protection equipment to lend, transfer, or sell to rural fire departments and rural fire protection districts.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 162, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 18-0207; S.L. 1975, ch. 189, § 1; 1981, ch. 247, § 1; 1997, ch. 203, § 1; 2007, ch. 205, § 1.

Collateral References.

Forest conservation legislation, constitutionality of fire prevention, provisions of, 13 A.L.R.2d 1095.

18-02-08.
Designation of forest protection districts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 203, § 2.

18-02-09.
Powers of rangers, wardens, and deputies. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 203, § 2.